Utah statutes.
58-37c-19.9.   Anhydrous ammonia is a precursor -- Requirements regarding purposes and containers.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor who is not licensed to engage in a regulated transaction and is not excepted from licensure or exempted under Subsection (2), and who possesses any amount of anhydrous ammonia under circumstances not amounting to a violation of Subsection 58-37c-3(12)(k) or 58-37d-4(1)(a).

(2)  A person who possesses anhydrous ammonia has an affirmative defense to a charge under Subsection (1) if the person is:

(a)  directly involved in or actively operating land in agricultural use as defined in Section 59-2-502;

(b)  a retail distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer, warehouseman, or common carrier, or an agent of any of these persons, who possesses anhydrous ammonia in the regular course of lawful business activities;

(c)  directly involved in or actively operating a business or other lawful activity providing or using anhydrous ammonia for refrigeration applications; or

(d)  directly involved in or actively operating a lawful business enterprise, including an industrial enterprise, that uses anhydrous ammonia in the regular course of its business activities.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2000 General Session

